Montana, session 2025, HB480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Trial jury right in constitutional challenges -- definition. (1) When a proceeding
challenges the constitutionality or other illegality of a legislative act or a proposed or adopted ballot issue, as
defined in 13-1-101, and that proceeding involves the determination of an issue of fact, any party to the
proceeding is entitled to a trial by jury on a determination of an issue of fact that is in dispute.
(2) When a proceeding under this chapter challenges the constitutionality or other illegality of a
legislative act or a proposed or adopted ballot issue, as defined in 13-1-101, and that proceeding involves the
determination of an issue of fact, any party to the proceeding is entitled to a trial by jury on a determination of
an issue of fact that is in dispute.
Section 2. Section 27-8-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-8-302. Jury trial. (1) When a proceeding under this chapter involves the determination of an
issue of fact, such the issue may be tried and determined in the same manner as issues of fact are tried and
determined in other civil actions in the court in which the proceeding is pending.
(2) When a proceeding under this chapter challenges the constitutionality or other illegality of a
legislative act or a proposed or adopted ballot issue, as defined in 13-1-101, and that proceeding involves the
determination of an issue of fact, any party to the proceeding is entitled to a trial by jury on a determination of
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 480
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 480
an issue of fact that is in dispute."
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
3, chapter 15, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 15, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 5. Applicability. [This act] applies to proceedings under [this act] for which a party to a civil
action has demanded a jury trial on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 480
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 480, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 480
INTRODUCED BY B. LER, G. OVERSTREET, R. GREGG, C. SCHOMER, M. THIEL, T. MILLETT, N. NICOL,
S. FITZPATRICK, K. ZOLNIKOV, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO WHEN A PARTY TO A PROCEEDING IS ENTITLED
TO A TRIAL BY JURY; PROVIDING THAT ANY PARTY IN A PROCEEDING CHALLENGING LEGISLATIVE
ACTS OR BALLOT ISSUES MAY DEMAND A TRIAL BY JURY TO DETERMINE AN ISSUE OF FACT; AND
AMENDING SECTION 27-8-302, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND AN
APPLICABILITY DATE.”